Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB75.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13(a)(31) and (g) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, are amended to read:Section 13. Prohibited Acts; Penalties.--(a) The following acts and the causing thereof within the Commonwealth are hereby prohibited:* * *(31) Notwithstanding other subsections of this section[,]: (i) the possession of a small amount of marihuana only for 12345678910111213141516171819202122 personal use; (ii) the possession of a small amount of marihuana with the intent to distribute it but not to sell it; [or] (iii) the distribution of a small amount of marihuana but not for sale[.For purposes of this subsection, thirty (30) grams of marihuana or eight (8) grams of hashish shall be considered a small amount of marihuana.]; or (iv) the smoking of a small amount of marihuana in a public space.As used in this subsection:"Public space" means a street, alley, park, sidewalk, a vehicle in or upon any street, alley, park or parking area or any other place to which the public is invited."Small amount of marihuana" means thirty (30) grams or less of marihuana or eight (8) grams or less of hashish."Smoking" means inhaling, exhaling, burning or carrying a lighted cigarette, cigar, pipe or other device which contains marihuana.* * *(g) (1) Any person who violates clause [(31)] (31) (i), (ii) or (iii) of subsection (a) is guilty of a [misdemeanor] summary offense and upon conviction thereof shall be [sentenced to imprisonment not exceeding thirty days, or] ordered to pay a fine not exceeding [five hundred dollars ($500), or both.] twenty-five dollars ($25).(2) Any person who violates clause (31)(iv) of subsection (a) is guilty of a summary offense and upon conviction thereof shall be ordered to pay a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100).(3) A conviction under this subsection shall not trigger application of the mandatory license suspension provisions under 20250SB0075PN0031 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 75 Pa.C.S. § 1532(c) (relating to suspension of operating privilege).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0075PN0031 - 3 - 1234